Washington statutes.
RCW 19.60.045

Duties upon notification that property is reported stolen.

Following notification from a law enforcement agency that an item of property has been reported as stolen, the pawnbroker or secondhand dealer shall hold that property intact and safe from alteration, damage, or commingling. The pawnbroker or secondhand dealer shall place an identifying tag or other suitable identification upon the property so held. Property held shall not be released for one hundred twenty days from the date of police notification unless released by written consent of the applicable law enforcement agency or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction. In cases where the applicable law enforcement agency has placed a verbal hold on an item, that agency must then give written notice within ten business days. If such written notice is not received within that period of time, then the hold order will cease. The pawnbroker or secondhand dealer shall give a twenty-day written notice before the expiration of the one hundred twenty-day holding period to the applicable law enforcement agency about the stolen property. If notice is not given within twenty days, then the hold on the property shall continue for an additional one hundred twenty days. The applicable law enforcement agency may renew the holding period for additional one hundred twenty-day periods as necessary. After the receipt of notification from a pawnbroker or secondhand dealer, if an additional holding period is required, the applicable law enforcement agency shall give the pawnbroker or secondhand dealer written notice, prior to the expiration of the existing hold order. A law enforcement agency shall not place on hold any item of personal property unless that agency reasonably suspects that the item of personal property is a lost or stolen item. Any hold that is placed on an item will be removed as soon as practicable after the item on hold is determined not to be stolen or lost.

[ 1991 c 323 s 4; 1984 c 10 s 5.]

NOTES:

Receiving stolen property: RCW 9A.56.140 through 9A.56.170.